Louisiana, session 2026, HB845.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:414(I)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§414. Suspension, revocation, renewal, and cancellation of licenses; judicial review
* * *
I.(1) The reinstatement fee for a license of a person who has been convicted
of or forfeited bond on or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of
operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of beverages of high alcoholic
content, of low alcoholic content, of narcotic drugs, or of central nervous system
stimulants shall be one two hundred dollars if one conviction appears listed on his
record prior to application for reinstatement; two four hundred dollars if two such
convictions appear on his record prior to application for reinstatement; and three six
hundred dollars for each conviction on his record after the second conviction prior
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 845 ENROLLED
to application for reinstatement, and the requirements of R.S. 32:896 relative to proof
of financial responsibility have been satisfied.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.